Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.207

Claims arising from emergency management related activities—Filing—Consideration, adjustment, settlement, etc., by director—Effect.

The director, with the approval of the attorney general, may consider, ascertain, adjust, determine, compromise and settle property loss or damage claims arising out of conduct or circumstances for which the state of Washington would be liable in law for money damages of two thousand dollars or less. The acceptance by the claimant of any such award, compromise, or settlement shall be final and conclusive on the claimant; and upon the state of Washington, unless procured by fraud, and shall constitute a complete release of any claim against the state of Washington. A request for administrative settlement shall not preclude a claimant from filing court action pending administrative determination, or limit the amount recoverable in such a suit, or constitute an admission against interest of either the claimant or the state.

[ 1986 c 266 s 31; 1984 c 38 s 22; 1974 ex.s. c 171 s 25; 1971 ex.s. c 8 s 5.]

NOTES:

Severability—1986 c 266: See note following RCW 38.52.005.